Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 15

Manufacturers' and Processors' Liens

66-15-101. Cotton ginners' lien.

The charges and tolls of ginners are secured by a lien on all cotton ginned and baled by them, covering all ginning and baling charges.

The lien created by subsection (a) is second only to the landlord and furnishers liens.

The lien shall continue for six (6) months after such tolls and charges become due and payable, and until the termination of any and all litigation pertaining thereto, commenced before the expiration of the six (6) months.

Acts 1921, ch. 142, §§ 1-3; Shan. Supp., §§ 3558a1-3558a3; mod. Code 1932, §§ 7981-7983; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-1501 — 64-1503.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1977).

66-15-102. Textile processors' lien.

All persons or corporations engaged in the business of manufacturing, bleaching, mercerizing, dyeing, printing or finishing cotton, silk, artificial silk, wool, synthetic fibers or goods of which cotton, silk, artificial silk, wool or synthetic fibers form a component part, shall be entitled to a lien upon the goods and property of others that may come or may have come into their possession for the purpose of being manufactured, bleached, mercerized, dyed, printed or finished, or for any other purpose, for the amount that may be due them from the owners of such goods or other property, by reason of any freight advanced or any work or labor performed or materials furnished in and about the manufacturing, bleaching, mercerizing, dyeing, printing or finishing or otherwise treating or processing of the same or other goods of such owner or owners.

The lien shall not be waived, suspended or impaired by the recovery of any judgment, or the taking of any bill or note, for the money due, for such work, labor or materials and such lien may be enforced as though such judgment had not been recovered or such bill or note taken.

When any person or corporation engaged in the business of manufacturing, bleaching, mercerizing, dyeing, printing or finishing cotton, silk, artificial silk, wool, synthetic fibers or goods of which cotton, silk, artificial silk, wool or synthetic fibers form a component part, may have a lien on the goods and property of others that may have come into the possession of such person or corporation for the purpose of being manufactured, bleached, mercerized, dyed, printed, or finished, or otherwise treated and processed, or for any other purpose, and the amount due on the goods or property shall remain due and unpaid either in whole or part for the space of two (2) months after the same becomes due and payable, it shall be lawful for the person or corporation having the lien to expose the cotton, silk, artificial silk, wool, synthetic fibers or goods and property for sale at public auction, upon a notice of sale being first published for the space of two (2) weeks, at least once in each week, preceding the day of sale, in some newspaper published in the county in which the goods or property are located, and also upon five (5) days' notice of sale set up in three (3) or more public places in the county, one (1) whereof shall be in the town or city, if any, in which the goods or property are located; and, if the residence of the owner or owners can be ascertained, a copy of the printed notice shall be mailed to the owner or owners at least five (5) days before the day of sale.

The proceeds of the sale shall be applied to the payment of the lien and the expenses of the sale.

No more of the goods or property shall be sold, if they are easily separated or divided, than shall be necessary, as near as may be, to pay such lien and expense.

The balance of the proceeds of sale of the goods or property, if any, shall be paid or delivered to the owner or owners entitled to the proceeds.

Nothing in this section contained shall be construed to be in derogation of the right of the lienor to enforce the lien by any other lawful procedure.

The lien created by this section shall not continue after the property has been transferred from the lienor.

Acts 1933, ch. 39, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7983.1-7983.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-1504 — 64-1506; Acts 1988, ch. 825, § 1.

66-15-103. Printers' and binders' lien.

Typographers, printers, lithographers, photoengravers, electrotypers, stereotypers, bookbinders, and/or book manufacturers are given a lien on all type set by them, electrotype, stereotype, photoengraved or lithographic plates or stones made by them and on all plates, dies, engravings and/or materials of any sort prepared or supplied by the manufacturer, or furnished by the customer to facilitate production, so long as the items shall remain in the plant warehouses, vaults or custody of the manufacturer, which the lien or liens shall act to secure amounts owing by the customer to such manufacturer, and remaining unpaid on any part of the work performed and materials or services supplied by the manufacturer, and shall be a prior lien on same.

The lien created by subsection (a) shall not be lost or waived; provided any of the completed work or partially completed work remains in the plant, custody or control of those to whom the lien is given, as set out in subsection (a), except by special written release by the printer, binder, worker or manufacturer, and the acceptance of notes, trade acceptance, and/or guarantees of payments, whether matured or not, in payment of the debt or account, shall not invalidate or affect the lien or its priority.

Before the lien can be enforced, written notice of intention to claim the lien must be given by the lienee to the party for whom the work was done, by giving the notice to such party by registered mail at that party's last known place of address; and not earlier than ten (10) days thereafter the lien shall be enforceable in chancery as provided for the enforcement of other similar liens.

The lienee or claimant of the lien shall have a period of ninety (90) days from giving of the notice of the intention to claim the lien to file a bill in chancery for the enforcement of same, and, if such action is not brought within that period of time, the lien shall expire.

Acts 1937, ch. 228, §§ 1-3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7983.4-7983.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-1507 — 64-1510.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.